src/fst/incoming/verbstems.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.ASPECT.PFV@
@U.ASPECT.FUT@
@U.ASPECT.OPT@
@U.TAMA.%0@
@U.TAMA.aa@
@U.TAMA.n@
@U.TAMA.dh@
@U.TAMA.u@
@U.VV.%0@
@U.VV.H@
@U.VV.L@
@U.VV.D@
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@


LEXICON Root

VerbThemes;

LEXICON VerbThemes

! etsüh[cry]:tsüh                         		INTR-0-IPFV-0;
! etsüh[cry]:tsia'                        		INTR-aa-PFV-0;
! etsüh[cry]:tsüh                     			INTR-aa-FUT-0;
! etsüh[cry]:tsüü                         		INTR-u-OPT-0;

! etsanh[defecate]:tsanh					INTR-0-IPFV-0;
! etsanh[defecate]:tsąą					INTR-dh-PFV-0;
! etsanh[defecate]:tsanh					INTR-aa-FUT-0;
! etsanh[defecate]:tsan					INTR-u-OPT-0;

! ełüh[urinate]:łüh					    INTR-0-IPFV-0;
! ełüh[urinate]:łia'					INTR-dh-PFV-0;
! ełüh[urinate]:łüh					    INTR-aa-FUT-0;
! ełüh[urinate]:łüü					    INTR-u-OPT-0;

! ne'iah[stringO]:nE.'iah					INTR-0-IPFV-0;
! ne'iah[stringO]:nE.'iah					INTR-dh-PFV-0;
! ne'iah[stringO]:nE.'iah					INTR-aa-FUT-0;
! ne'iah[stringO]:nE.'iah					INTR-u-OPT-0;

! neh'įh[seeO]:nE.'įh					INTR-0-IPFV-H;
! neh'įh[seeO]:nE.'įį'					INTR-aa-PFV-H;
! neh'įh[seeO]:nE.'įįł					INTR-aa-FUT-H;
! neh'įh[seeO]:nE.'įį					INTR-u-OPT-H;

! etnaa[work]:naa						INTR-0-IPFV-D;
! etnaa[work]:na'						INTR-aa-PFV-D;
! etnaa[work]:naa					    INTR-aa-FUT-D;
! etnaa[work]:naa'					    INTR-u-OPT-D;

! eldeeł[eatpO]:deeł					INTR-0-IPFV-L;
! eldeeł[eatpO]:deeł					INTR-aa-PFV-L;
! eldeeł[eatpO]:deeł					INTR-aa-FUT-L;
! eldeeł[eatpO]:deeł					INTR-u-OPT-L;

! na'etkuyh[vomit]:na=kuyh				INTR-0-IPFV-D;
! na'etkuyh[vomit]:na=kuyh				INTR-dh-PFV-D;
! na'etkuyh[vomit]:na=kuyh				INTR-aa-FUT-D;
! na'etkuyh[vomit]:na=kuyh				INTR-u-OPT-D;

! delxoh[play]:dE.xoh					INTR-0-IPFV-L;
! delxoh[play]:dE.xoh					INTR-aa-PFV-L;
! delxoh[play]:dE.xoh					INTR-aa-FUT-L;
! delxoh[play]:dE.xoh					INTR-u-OPT-L;

! nįįmbeeyh[swimSurface]:mbeeyh				INTR-n-IPFV-0;
! nįįmbeeyh[swimSurface]:mbeeł				INTR-aa-IPFV-0;
! nįįmbeeyh[swimSurface]:mįį				INTR-n-PFV-0;
! nįįmbeeyh[swimSurface]:mbeeł				INTR-aa-FUT-0;
! nįįmbeeyh[swimSurface]:mbeey				INTR-u-OPT-0;

! naholnek[tell.story]:na=hoE.nek				INTR-0-IPFV-L;
! naholnek[tell.story]:na=hoE.nek				INTR-aa-PFV-L;
! naholnek[tell.story]:na=hoE.nek				INTR-aa-FUT-L;
! naholnek[tell.story]:na=hoE.nek				INTR-u-OPT-L;

! eedlah[classify.PL.O]:dlah                  INTR-0-PFV-0;  !check with Olga why the forms for the IPFV and PFV are similar 

! eetąą[classify.LRO]:tąą                     INTR-0-IPFV-0;

! ee'ąą[classify.CO]:ąą                       INTR-dh-PFV-O;
! ee'ąą[classify.CO]:ą'                       INTR-aa-PFV-O;


! nįįnah[move.nomadically]:naholnek           INTR-n-IPFV-0;    !Imperative
! nįįnąą[move.nomadically]:nąą                INTR-n-PFV-0;

! atkeeł[go.by.boat]:keeł                     INTR-aa-IPFV-D;   !Progressive


!
! Intransitive verb forms.
!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!Singular only!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!SG.go
aahaał[SG.go]:haał                         		INTR-n-IPFV-0-SG;
aahaał[SG.go]:shyah                        		INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;
aahaał[SG.go]:shyah                        		INTR-aa-PFV-0-SG;
aahaał[SG.go]:haał                     	   		INTR-aa-FUT-0-SG;
aahaał[SG.go]:shya'                        		INTR-u-OPT-0-SG;

! na'inshyah[SG.arrive.back]:na=shyah			    INTR-n-PFV-D-SG;

! ninįįhaał[SG.go.to.a.point]:ni=haał             INTR-n-IPFV-0-SG;  !Imperative
! ninįįshyah[SG.go.to.a.point]:ni=shyah           INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;
 
! łoonįįshyah[SG.go.all.over]:łoo=shyah			  INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;

! tinįįshyah[SG.start.to.move]:t=haał			  INTR-n-IPFV-0-SG;  !a rule for i insertion required

! danįįshyah[SG.go.inside]:da=shyah			    INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;

! tthinįįshyah[SG.go.outside]:tthi=shyah			INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;

! ki'įįhshyah[SG.go.up]:ki=shyah				  INTR-aa-PFV-0-SG;

! skinįįshyah[SG.go.across]:ski=shyah			  INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;

! kitl'a'įįshyah[SG.go.ashore]:kitl'a=shyah		INTR-aa-PFV-0-SG;

! snake'aahaał[SG.go.around.in.a.circle]:snake=haał	INTR-aa-IPV-0-SG;

! stanįįshyah[SG.go.away]:sta=shyah			    INTR-n-PFV-0-SG;


! !SG fly

! haniit'ak[SG.fly.up.out]:ha=nE.t'ak             INTR-aa-PFV-0-SG;

! daneet'ak[SG.fly.up]:da=nE.t'ak                 INTR-dh-PFV-0-SG;

! tth'ineet'ak[SG.fly.straight]:tth'i=nE.t'ak     INTR-dh-PFV-0-SG;

! !SG run

! altthał[SG.run]:tthał                           INTR-aa-IPV-L-SG; !Progressive

! naįltthat[SG.run.to.a.point]:ni=tthat           INTR-n-PFV-L-SG;

! teltthät[SG.run.off]:t=tthät                    INTR-dh-PFV-L-SG;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!Plural only!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!Pl.go
haadeeł[PL.go]:deeł                        	    INTR-n-IPFV-0-PL;
haadeeł[PL.go]:deeł                        		INTR-n-PFV-0-PL;
haadeeł[PL.go]:däł                        		INTR-aa-PFV-0-PL;
haadeeł[PL.go]:däł                     	   		INTR-aa-FUT-0-PL;
haadeeł[PL].go]:deel                        	INTR-u-OPT-0-PL;



LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;



LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.dh@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.dh@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.dh@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.dh@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.FUT@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.FUT@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.FUT@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.FUT@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-0
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.OPT@@U.TAMA.u@@U.VV.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-D
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.OPT@@U.TAMA.u@@U.VV.D@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-H
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.OPT@@U.TAMA.u@@U.VV.H@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-L
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.OPT@@U.TAMA.u@@U.VV.L@ Verbsuffixes;


!Sg only verbs

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-0-IPVF-0;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-0-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-0-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-0-IPFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-IPFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-IPFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-IPFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-IPFV-L;



LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-n-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-dh-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-dh-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-dh-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-dh-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-FUT-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-FUT-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-FUT-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-aa-FUT-L;


LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-0-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-u-OPT-0;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-D-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-u-OPT-D;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-H-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-u-OPT-H;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-L-SG
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ INTR-u-OPT-L;

!Pl only verbs

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-0-IPFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-0-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-0-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-0-IPFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-IPFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-IPFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-IPFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-IPFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-IPFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-IPFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-n-IPFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-IPFV-L;



LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-PFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-n-PFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-n-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-dh-PFV-0;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-dh-PFV-D;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-dh-PFV-H;

LEXICON INTR-dh-PFV-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-dh-PFV-L;


LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-FUT-0;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-FUT-D;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-FUT-H;

LEXICON INTR-aa-FUT-L-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-aa-FUT-L;


LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-0-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-u-OPT-0;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-D-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-u-OPT-D;

LEXICON INTR-u-OPT-H-PL
@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ INTR-u-OPT-H;
